District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2602.06

Reinsurance of risks.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-36, § 6(b)
as added May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255, § 26(c), 41 DCR 5193
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1406.